Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-14,111
Applicability of act.

The Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act shall apply to rental agreements entered into, extended, or renewed after January 1, 1985.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 62.